District of Columbia statutes.
44-108.01

General.

A resident assessment required by this subchapter shall form the basis for the development of the resident’s service plan, and shall be completed for all routine admissions to the ALR.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 801, 47 DCR 2647